Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1641
Petition; resolution; adoption, restrictions; hearing; notice.

(1) A resolution described in section 39-1639 shall not be adopted by the board during the same meeting at which such resolution was proposed.

(2) If special assessments are proposed to be levied in a district, the board shall set a time and place for a hearing on the proposed resolution and give notice of such hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county on the same day each week during two successive weeks immediately prior to such hearing and posting such notice in three conspicuous places in the proposed district.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 4, p. 681;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 53.
July 18, 2026